Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2742
Nontestamentary transfer on death.

(a) Subject to section 30-2333, a transfer on death resulting from a registration in beneficiary form is effective by reason of the contract regarding the registration between the owner and the registering entity and sections 30-2734 to 30-2745 and is not testamentary.

(b) Sections 30-2734 to 30-2745 do not limit the rights of creditors of security owners against beneficiaries and other transferees under other laws of this state.

Laws 1993, LB 250, § 28;

Laws 2017, LB517, § 5.